Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8002
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Health Care Prompt Payment Act:

(1) Claim form means an insurer's standard printed or electronic transaction form that complies with the standards issued by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services or, if an insurer does not have a standard printed or electronic transaction form, any form which complies with such standards;

(2) Clean claim means a claim for payment of health care services that is submitted by a Nebraska health care provider to an insurer on a claim form with all required fields completed with information to adjudicate the claim in accordance with any published filing requirements of the insurer;

(3) Director means the Director of Insurance;

(4) Insurer means an entity that contracts to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of health care services, including a sickness and accident insurance company, a health maintenance organization, a prepaid limited health service organization, a prepaid dental service corporation, a participant in an insurance arrangement as defined in section 44-4105, or any other entity providing a plan of health insurance, health benefits, or health care services. Insurer does not include the medical assistance program established pursuant to the Medical Assistance Act, a property and liability insurer, a motor vehicle insurer, a workers' compensation insurer, a risk management pool, or a self-insured employer who contracts for services to be provided through a managed care plan certified pursuant to section 48-120.02;

(5) Prompt payment act compliance statement means a certification made in good faith by an insurer that, during the twenty-four-month period ending on the preceding June 30, it paid, denied, or settled more than ninety percent of its clean claims within the time periods set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of section 44-8004;

(6) Repricer means an entity that receives claims from health care providers and submits them to insurers after adjudicating or repricing such claims; and

(7) Unfair payment pattern means any of the following patterns of conduct:

(a) Engaging in a demonstrable and unjust pattern of reviewing or processing complete and accurate claims that results in payment delays;

(b) Engaging in a demonstrable and unjust pattern of reducing the amount of payment or denying complete and accurate claims;

(c) Repeated failure to pay the uncontested portions of a claim within the time periods specified in section 44-8004; or

(d) Failing on a repeated basis to pay the interest when due on claims pursuant to section 44-8005.

Laws 2005, LB 389, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 66.

Medical Assistance Act, see section 68-901.